Utah statutes.
9-4-1203.   Division -- Functions.
(1)  In addition to any other functions the governor or Legislature may
assign:
(a)  the division shall:
(i)  provide a clearinghouse of information for federal, state, and local
housing assistance programs;
(ii)  establish, in cooperation with political subdivisions, model plans and
management methods to encourage or provide for the development of affordable
housing that may be adopted by political subdivisions by reference;
(iii)  undertake, in cooperation with political subdivisions, a realistic
assessment of problems relating to housing needs, such as:
(A)  inadequate supply of dwellings;
(B)  substandard dwellings; and
(C)  inability of medium and low income families to obtain adequate housing;
(iv)  provide the information obtained under Subsection (1)(a)(iii) to:
(A)  political subdivisions;
(B)  real estate developers;
(C)  builders;
(D)  lending institutions;
(E)  affordable housing advocates; and
(F)  others having use for the information;
(v)  advise political subdivisions of serious housing problems existing within
their jurisdiction that require concerted public action for solution; and
(vi)  assist political subdivisions in defining housing objectives and in
preparing for adoption a plan of action covering a five-year period designed
to accomplish housing objectives within their jurisdiction; and
(b)  within legislative appropriations, the division may accept for and on
behalf of, and bind the state to, any federal housing or homeless program in
which the state is invited, permitted, or authorized to participate in the
distribution, disbursement, or administration of any funds or service
advanced, offered, or contributed in whole or in part by the federal
government.
(2)  The administration of any federal housing program in which the state is
invited, permitted, or authorized to participate in distribution, disbursement
or administration of funds or services, except those administered by the Utah
Housing Corporation, is governed by Sections 9-4-701 through 9-4-708.
